Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.020

Application of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to any county or municipal corporation, or any political subdivision of the state of Washington, including district courts and superior courts, except as otherwise provided by RCW 54.04.170, 54.04.180, and chapters 41.59, 47.64, and 53.18 RCW.

[ 1999 c 217 s 1; 1994 c 297 s 1; 1993 c 76 s 2; 1992 c 36 s 1; 1989 c 275 s 1; 1987 c 135 s 1; 1985 c 7 s 107; 1983 c 3 s 98; 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 135: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 135 s 4.]